District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.20

No inurement to private persons; exemption from District taxation.

(a)

All rights, property and assets of the Authority shall transfer automatically to the District government upon dissolution of the Authority.

(b)

None of the property, assets or earnings of the Authority shall inure to any private person or entity.

(c)

The Authority, its income, property, and transactions shall be exempt from District taxes.

History

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 220
as added Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-184, § 202(n), 43 DCR 4265

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1690.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(n) of the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-293, July 9, 1996, 43 DCR 4160).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(n) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-397, October 9, 1996, 43 DCR 5686), § 2(n) of the Water and Sewer Authority Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-466, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 165), and § 2(n) of the Water and Sewer Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-48, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2105).